Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.180

Examination of disability beneficiary—Reentry.

(1) The board may, at its pleasure, require any disability beneficiary under age sixty-two in the miscellaneous personnel and under age fifty-five in the uniformed personnel to undergo medical examination by medical authority designated by the board. Upon the basis of such examination the board shall determine whether such disability beneficiary is still totally and permanently incapacitated, either physically or mentally, for service in the office or department of the city where he or she was employed or in any other position in that city, the duties of which he or she might reasonably be expected to carry out.

(2) If the board shall determine that the beneficiary is not so incapacitated his or her retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall be reinstated forthwith in city service. If the city is unable to find employment for a disability beneficiary found to be no longer totally and permanently disabled, the board shall continue the disability retirement allowance of the beneficiary until such time as employment is available, except as provided in paragraph (4) of this section.

(3) Should a disability beneficiary reenter city service and be eligible for membership in the retirement system, his or her retirement allowance shall be canceled and he or she shall immediately become a member of the retirement system, his or her rate of contribution for future years being that established for his or her age at the time of such reentry. His or her individual account shall be credited with his or her accumulated contributions less the annuity payments made to him or her. An amount equal to the accumulated normal contributions so credited to him or her shall again be held for the benefit of said member and shall no longer be included in the amounts available to meet the obligations of the city on account of benefits that have been granted. Such member shall receive credit for prior service in the same manner as if he or she had never been retired for disability.

(4) Should any disability beneficiary under age sixty-two in the miscellaneous personnel or under age fifty-five in the uniformed personnel, refuse to submit to medical examination, his or her retirement allowance may be discontinued until his or her withdrawal of such refusal, and should refusal continue for one year, his or her retirement allowance may be canceled. Should said disability beneficiary, prior to attaining age sixty-two or age fifty-five, as the case may be, engage in a gainful occupation the board shall reduce the amount of his or her retirement allowance to an amount, which when added to the compensation earned by him or her in such occupation, shall not exceed the amount of the final compensation on the basis of which his or her retirement allowance was determined. Should the earning capacity of such beneficiary be further altered, the board may further alter his or her retirement allowance as indicated above. When said disability beneficiary reaches age sixty-two, if included in the miscellaneous personnel, or age fifty-five, in the uniformed personnel, his or her retirement allowance shall be made equal to the amount upon which he or she was originally retired, and shall not again be modified for any cause except as provided in RCW 41.44.250.

(5) Should the retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be canceled for any cause other than reentrance into city service, he or she shall be paid his or her accumulated contributions, less annuity payments made to him or her.

[ 2012 c 117 s 71; 1961 c 227 s 8; 1947 c 71 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-147.]